Hawaii statutes.
§189-11 Receipts in duplicate. Every
commercial marine dealer shall issue receipts to the person from whom marine
life is obtained and shall provide the following information in the receipt:

(1) The date of the issuance;

(2) The name of the person to whom the receipt is
issued;

(3) The following information with respect to each of
the varieties of marine life as the department shall require including:

(A) The weight in pounds of each of the
varieties received;

(B) The numbers of marine life when they
average a pound or more; and

(C) The price per pound paid; and

(D) With regard to aquarium fish, regardless
of weight, the number and species of the fishes; and

(4) The signature of the dealer who issues the
receipt.

Any dealer taking the dealer's own marine life or
handling any marine life taken by commercial marine licensees working for or
with the dealer, shall make out the same receipt, giving market price for the
marine life as prevails on the date of receipt. A duplicate copy of this receipt
shall be kept on file at the premise where the marine life was sold by the
dealer issuing the same for a period of twelve months from the date of
issuance, and the duplicate copy shall be available for inspection upon the
demand of any conservation officer authorized to enforce the laws of the State.
[L 1925, c 202, §2; am L 1929, c 115, §2; RL 1935, §381; RL 1945, §1266; am L
1945, c 24, §2; RL 1955, §21-123; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; HRS §189-11; am L 1981, c 85, §85; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 2, §2; am L
1997, c 307, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next